Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3138.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 28-22 of the General Laws entitled "Division of Professional
Regulation" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
28-22-4. Retirement status license.
(a) Any person currently holding a license issued or overseen by the division of
professional regulation who has attained the age of sixty-five (65) may renew their license as a
retirement status license subject and pursuant to subsections (b) through (d) of this section.
(b) An applicant for a retirement status license shall submit their original license to the
division of professional regulation, along with a form, to be provided by the division of professional
regulation, for such classification, which shall contain a statement expressing the licensee’s status
as retired and acknowledging that the applicant shall not actively engage in the practice of the
occupation or trade for which a license was originally issued, while possessing a retirement status
license.
(c) A licensee issued a retirement status license shall not practice or offer to practice the
occupation or trade for which a license was originally issued. The division of professional
regulation and any licensing boards associated therewith are authorized to investigate violations of
this provision in the same manner and bearing the same penalties as the unauthorized or unlicensed
practice of a regulated occupation or trade.
(d) If the division of professional regulation issues a retirement status license pursuant to

this section, it shall return the original license submitted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
to the applicant. Such original license shall bear a designation or be stamped “Retired”.
(e) The fee for a retirement status license shall be twenty dollars ($20.00).
(f) A licensee issued a retirement status license may restore such licensee’s original license
by submitting a form, to be provided by the division of professional regulation, requesting
reinstatement by paying the then-current annual fee for such license, and demonstrating completion
of the most recent continuing education requirements or any other continuing or ongoing training
requirements applicable to the license, as though the licensee had remained in active status during
the year immediately preceding reinstatement.
(g) The division or professional regulation may, for good cause shown, grant a retirement
status license to a person who does not meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC006159
========
LC006159 - Page 2 of 3